District of Columbia statutes.
33-504

Repealed

Character of limited partner’s contribution.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 656, Pub. L. 87-716, § 4
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-204.
1973 Ed., § 41-404.